Utah statutes.
78B-14-204 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Simultaneous proceedings in another state.

(1)  A tribunal of this state may exercise jurisdiction to establish a support order if the petition is filed after a petition or comparable pleading is filed in another state only:

(a)  if the petition in this state is filed before the expiration of the time allowed in the other state for filing a responsive pleading challenging the exercise of jurisdiction by the other state;

(b)  if the contesting party timely challenges the exercise of jurisdiction in the other state; and

(c)  if relevant, this state is the home state of the child.

(2)  A tribunal of this state may not exercise jurisdiction to establish a support order if the petition is filed before a petition or comparable pleading is filed in another state:

(a)  if the petition or comparable pleading in the other state is filed before the expiration of the time allowed in this state for filing a responsive pleading challenging the exercise of jurisdiction by this state;

(b)  if the contesting party timely challenges the exercise of jurisdiction in this state; and

(c)  if relevant, the other state is the home state of the child.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

